Louisiana, session 2026, SB41.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 43:144 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§144. Penalty for failure to have proceedings published
The official of any municipal corporation, police jury, or school board by law
responsible for the preparing and recording of the official proceedings who, within
twenty thirty-one days from the date of any meeting at which the official
proceedings were had, wilfully neglects or fails to furnish the official journal with
a copy of the minutes, ordinances, resolutions, budgets, and proceedings for
publication, shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than five
hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for not less than ten days nor more than six
months, or both.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.